Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2771.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 122, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 430, O.S.L. 2024 (20 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 122), is amended to read as follows:
Section 122. The number of special judges that may be appointed
in each judicial administrative district shall be determined as
follows:
1. A special judge shall be appointed on the basis of one
special judge for each county within the administrative district
with a population of at least twenty-four thousand (24,000), as
determined by the 1960 Federal Decennial Census. An additional
special judge shall be appointed for each additional fifty thousand
(50,000) in population in a county within the administrative
district, as determined by the 1960 Federal Decennial Census. Such
appointment may be made from any county in the administrative
district. Such appointments shall be made by the district judges in
their respective judicial administrative districts. Any judge of a

special sessions court shall be one of the special judges for the
balance of his or her term and shall be within the number prescribed
for such district.
2. In addition to the special judges that may be appointed
pursuant to the provisions of paragraph 1 of this section, there
shall be:
a. one (1) special judge appointed in the Northwest-
Panhandle Judicial Administrative District comprised
of District Court Judicial Districts Numbers One (1),
Two (2) and Four (4), to serve in Custer County,
b. one (1) beginning July 1, 2025, three (3) special
judge judges appointed in the Oklahoma-Canadian
Counties Judicial Administrative District comprised of
District Court Judicial District Number Seven (7),
c. beginning July 1, 2024, five (5) special judges
appointed in the Tulsa-Pawnee Counties Judicial
Administrative District comprised of District Court
Judicial District Number Fourteen (14),
d. beginning January 11, 1999, one (1) special judge
appointed in the Northeastern Judicial Administrative
District comprised of District Court Judicial
Districts Numbers Ten (10), Eleven (11), Twelve (12)
and Thirteen (13), to serve in Rogers County,
e. one (1) special judge appointed in the North-Central
Judicial Administrative District comprised of District
Court Judicial District Numbers Eight (8), Nine (9)
and Twenty-three (23), to serve in Lincoln and
Pottawatomie Counties,
f. beginning January 1, 2006, one (1) special judge
appointed in the East-Central Judicial Administrative
District comprised of District Court Judicial District
Numbers Fifteen (15), Eighteen (18) and Twenty-four
(24), to serve in Pittsburg and McIntosh Counties,
g. beginning January 1, 2006, one (1) special judge
appointed in the Northeastern Judicial Administrative
District comprised of District Court Judicial District
ENR. H. B. NO. 2771 Page 2

Numbers Ten (10), Eleven (11), Twelve (12) and
Thirteen (13), to serve in Washington County, and
h. beginning January 1, 2007, one (1) special judge
appointed in the Southeastern Judicial Administrative
District comprised of District Court Judicial District
Numbers Sixteen (16), Seventeen (17), Nineteen (19),
and Twenty-five (25), to serve in Le Flore County.
3. If a vacancy occurs in the office of associate district
judge, or if an associate district judge becomes unable to perform
the duties of his or her office, as determined by the presiding
judge of the judicial administrative district, a special judge may
be appointed within the judicial administrative district to hold
office for the duration of such vacancy or incapacity. After the
vacancy is filled, or after the associate district judge becomes
able to perform the duties of his or her office, the special judge
shall have the power to act in regard to any case which he or she
has already tried, but the presiding judge of the judicial
administrative district may transfer such a case to any other judge
in the judicial administrative district.
4. The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court may authorize the
appointment of such additional special judges as may be necessary
for the proper administration of justice. Such additional special
judges shall be appointed after application by a majority of the
district judges of a judicial administrative district, stating the
reason why an additional special judge is needed. Such additional
judges need not be based upon population figures.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2771 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2771 Page 4